Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB65.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly finds that the proposed ordinary amendment to 907 KAR 23:010, Outpatient
Pharmacy Program, was found deficient pursuant to KRS 13A.030, on or after March 28, 2025, and before
April 15, 2026, as evidenced by the records of the Legislative Research Commission.
(2) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding:
(a) If the proposed ordinary amendment referenced in subsection (1) of this section has not been adopted
on or before the effective date of this Act, the proposed ordinary amendment shall expire as of the
effective date of this Act; or
(b) If the proposed ordinary amendment referenced in subsection (1) of this section has been adopted on
or before the effective date of this Act, the administrative regulation, including any subsequently filed
amendments, shall be null, void, and unenforceable as of the effective date of this Act.
(3) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative
body shall be prohibited from promulgating an administrative regulation that is identical to, or substantially
the same as, the proposed amendment referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period beginning on
January 6, 2026, and concluding on June 1, 2027.
(4) The proposed amendment referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the public, in the
office of the Legislative Research Commission's regulations compiler.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly finds that the following proposed administrative regulations were found deficient
pursuant to KRS 13A.030, on or after March 28, 2025, and before April 15, 2026, as evidenced by the
records of the Legislative Research Commission:
(a) 804 KAR 13:020 and Emergency, Tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license application forms; and
(b) 804 KAR 13:030 and Emergency, Causes for denial of tobacco, nicotine, or vapor product license.
(2) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the proposed
administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable
as of the effective date of this Act.
(3) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative
body shall be prohibited from promulgating administrative regulations that are identical to, or substantially
the same as, the proposed administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period
beginning on January 6, 2026, and concluding on June 1, 2027.
(4) The proposed administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the
public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission's regulations compiler.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 13A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The General Assembly finds that the following proposed administrative regulations were found deficient
pursuant to KRS 13A.030, on or after March 28, 2025, and before April 15, 2026, as evidenced by the
records of the Legislative Research Commission:
(a) 601 KAR 9:120 and Emergency, Accessible online insurance verification system;
(b) 902 KAR 55:110, Monitoring system for prescription controlled substances; and
(c) 922 KAR 1:565, Service array for a relative or fictive kin caregiver.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the proposed
administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be null, void, and unenforceable
as of the effective date of this Act.
(3) Contrary provisions of any section of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the administrative
body shall be prohibited from promulgating administrative regulations that are identical to, or substantially
the same as, the proposed administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section for a period
beginning on January 6, 2026, and concluding on June 1, 2027.
(4) The proposed administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section shall be available to the
public, in the office of the Legislative Research Commission's regulations compiler.
Section 4. Whereas it is crucial that the Commonwealth's regulatory policy reflect the statutory intent of
the General Assembly, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by
the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.